Nebraska, session 109, LB444.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB444 LB444
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 75-307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
75-307 (1) Certificated intrastate motor carriers, including common
and contract carriers, any motor carrier transporting household goods
under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.03, and any motor
carrier transporting employees of a railroad carrier under a license
issued pursuant to section 75-304.04 shall comply with reasonable rules
and regulations prescribed by the commission governing the filing with
the commission, the approval of the filings, and the maintenance of proof
at such carrier's principal place of business of surety bonds, policies
of insurance, qualifications as a self-insurer, or other securities or
agreements, in such reasonable amount as required by the commission,
conditioned to pay, within the amount of such surety bonds, policies of
insurance, qualifications as a self-insurer, or other securities or
agreements, any final judgment recovered against such motor carrier for
bodily injuries to or the death of any person resulting from the
negligent operation, maintenance, or use of motor vehicles under such
certificate, permit, or license or for loss or damage to property of
others. No certificate or permit shall be issued to a common or contract
carrier, no license shall be issued to a motor carrier transporting
household goods under section 75-304.03 or employees of a railroad
carrier under section 75-304.04, nor shall such certificate, permit, or
license remain in force unless such carrier complies with this section
and the rules and regulations prescribed by the commission pursuant to
this section.
(2) The commission may, in its discretion and under its rules and
regulations, require any certificated carrier, any motor carrier
transporting household goods under a license issued pursuant to section
75-304.03, and any motor carrier transporting employees of a railroad
carrier under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.04 to file a
surety bond, policies of insurance, qualifications as a self-insurer, or
-2-

LB444 LB444
2025 2025
other securities or agreements, in a sum to be determined by the
commission, to be conditioned upon such carrier making compensation to
shippers or consignees for all property belonging to shippers or
consignees and coming into the possession of such carrier in connection
with its transportation service. Any carrier which may be required by law
to compensate a shipper or consignee for any loss, damage, or default for
which a connecting motor common carrier is legally responsible shall be
subrogated to the rights of such shipper or consignee under any such
bond, policies of insurance, or other securities or agreements to the
extent of the sum so paid.
(3) When setting the rates for required policies of insurance
pursuant to this section, the commission shall require at least a minimum
of one million dollars in uninsured and underinsured insurance coverage
per occupant.
(4) (3) In carrying out this section, the commission may classify
motor carriers and regulated motor carriers taking into consideration the
hazards of the operations of such carriers and the value of the household
goods carried. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to
authorize the commission to compel motor carriers other than those
transporting household goods under section 75-309 or under a license
issued pursuant to section 75-304.03 to carry cargo insurance.
(5) (4) This section does not apply to transportation network
companies.
Sec. 2. Original section 75-307, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-